Maine, session 132, LD212.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §634, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Dam removal; energy valuation and alternative ownership. Notwithstanding
any provision of this subarticle to the contrary, the department may not approve an
application for a permit to remove a dam that is part of a hydropower project unless the
applicant:
A. Provides to the department an evaluation of the monetary value of the electrical or
mechanical power that the dam is capable of generating; and
B. Demonstrates to the department that the applicant made all reasonable efforts to
sell the dam and was unable to reach an agreement on a sale with an alternative owner.
The department may adopt rules to implement this subsection. Rules adopted pursuant to
this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter
2-A.